Maine, session 132, LD2005.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4349, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Covered persons using mail order pharmacy; access to prescription drugs. If
a covered person is using a mail order pharmacy, the pharmacy benefits manager shall
allow for the dispensing of the covered person's prescription drug at a network pharmacy
under the following circumstances to ensure that the covered person has access to
prescription drugs.
A. If the prescription is delayed by more than one day after the expected delivery date
provided by the mail order pharmacy, the network pharmacy shall provide the covered
person up to a 7-day supply or the smallest prepackaged unit supply of the prescription
drug.
B. If the prescription drug arrives in an unusable condition, the network pharmacy
shall provide the prescription drug in accordance with the covered person’s
prescription.
A covered person that receives a prescription drug pursuant to paragraph A or B may not
be subject to any payment that exceeds the total of one copayment, coinsurance payment
or other out-of-pocket payment for the dispensing of that prescription drug.
Page 1 - 132LR2906(03)